Massachusetts, session 194th, H3178.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of Chapter 62, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by
inserting at the end thereof the following:-
There shall be established an electric agricultural and landscape equipment tax credit
program under which a taxpayer who operates a farm as defined in section 1A of chapter 128 or
landscape business as defined by section 60L of chapter 112 may be allowed a refundable tax
credit of not more than twenty-five percent of the total purchase price of electric powered
agricultural and landscaping equipment.
of 1